dictsource/ko_rules
// eSpeak Korean rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded

// char names (mostly to catch "ng" sound):
.group ᄋ
ᄋ	i;'u-N





.replace

// Note: These specific range of "normalized" unicode characters of Korean are
//   hardly used as individually, and look broken and badly aligned in most
//   fonts.
//   We're using hard tabs so that we can recognize where they are placed at
//   the first place.

// Stop finals and their consorts: ㄱㄲㅋ ㄷㅌ ㅂㅍ ㅅㅆㅈㅊ
.L01	ᆨ	ᆩ	ᆿ	ᆮ	ᇀ	ᆸ	ᇁ	ᆺ	ᆻ	ᆽ	ᆾ	ᆪ	ᆹ	ᆬ	ᆰ	ᆱ	ᆲ	ᆳ	ᆴ	ᆵ
// i and j-vowels: ㅣ ㅑㅒ ㅕㅖ ㅛㅠ
.L02	ᅵ	ᅣ	ᅤ	ᅧ	ᅨ	ᅭ	ᅲ
// h-finals: ㅎ ㄶㅀ
.L03	ᇂ	ᆭ	ᆶ

// Char names:


// Initials
// Order: ㄱㄲㅋ ㄷㄸㅌ ㅂㅃㅍ ㅅㅆㅈㅉㅊ ㄴㅁ ㄹ ㅎ

.group		ᄀ	// ㄱ
		ᄀ	q
	_)	ᄀ	g
	L01)	ᄀ	k-
	L03)	ᄀ	kh

.group		ᄁ	// ㄲ
		ᄁ	q-

.group		ᄏ	// ㅋ
		ᄏ	kh

.group		ᄃ	// ㄷ
		ᄃ	d
	_)	ᄃ	d
	L01)	ᄃ	t-
	L03)	ᄃ	th

.group		ᄄ	// ㄸ
		ᄄ	t-

.group		ᄐ	// ㅌ
		ᄐ	th

.group		ᄇ	// ㅂ
		ᄇ	b
	_)	ᄇ	p
	L01)	ᄇ	p-
	L03)	ᄇ	ph

.group		ᄈ	// ㅃ
		ᄈ	p-

.group		ᄑ	// ㅍ
		ᄑ	ph

.group		ᄉ	// ㅅ
		ᄉ	|s
	L01)	ᄉ	s-

.group		ᄊ	// ㅆ
		ᄊ	s-	// TODO: phoneme

.group		ᄌ	// ㅈ
		ᄌ	dZ;
	_)	ᄌ	tS;
	L01)	ᄌ	tS;-
	L03)	ᄌ	tSh;

.group		ᄍ	// ㅉ
		ᄍ	'tS;-	// TODO: phoneme

.group		ᄎ	// ㅊ
		ᄎ	tSh-	// TODO: phoneme

.group		ᄂ	// ㄴ
		ᄂ	;n

.group		ᄆ	// ㅁ
		ᄆ	;m

.group		ᄅ	// ㄹ
		ᄅ		*	// TODO: alveolar flap [ɾ]
		ᄅ	(_	l

.group		ᄒ	// ㅎ
		ᄒ	h	// TODO: [ɦ]
	_)	ᄒ	h

// Medials or vowels

.group		ᅡ	// ㅏ
		ᅡ	a

.group		ᅢ	// ㅐ
		ᅢ	E

.group		ᅣ	// ㅑ
		ᅣ	ja

.group		ᅤ	// ㅒ
		ᅤ	jE

.group		ᅥ	// ㅓ
		ᅥ	@

.group		ᅦ	// ㅔ
		ᅦ	e

.group		ᅧ	// ㅕ
		ᅧ	j@

.group		ᅨ	// ㅖ
		ᅨ	je

.group		ᅩ	// ㅗ
		ᅩ	o

.group		ᅪ	// ㅘ
		ᅪ	wa

.group		ᅫ	// ㅙ
		ᅫ	wE

.group		ᅬ	// ㅚ
		ᅬ	we	// was [Y] until 1970s

.group		ᅭ	// ㅛ
		ᅭ	jo

.group		ᅮ	// ㅜ
		ᅮ	u

.group		ᅯ	// ㅝ
		ᅯ	w@

.group		ᅰ	// ㅞ
		ᅰ	we

.group		ᅱ	// ㅟ
		ᅱ	wi	// was [y] until 1970s

.group		ᅲ	// ㅠ
		ᅲ	ju

.group		ᅳ	// ㅡ
		ᅳ	u-

.group		ᅴ	// ㅢ
		ᅴ	u-j	// TODO: [ɰi]
	C)	ᅴ	i

.group		ᅵ	// ㅣ
		ᅵ	i

// Finals
// Order: ㄱㄳㄲㅋ ㄷㅌ ㅂㅍ ㅅㅆㅈㅊ ㄴㅁ ㅇㅎ ㄹ

.group		ᆨ	// ㄱ
		ᆨ		q	// It is actually q, as using k adds unnecessary sound.
		ᆨᄒ		kh

.group		ᆪ	// ㄳ
		ᆪ		k
		ᆪ	(A	ks
		ᆪᄒ		kh

.group		ᆩ	// ㄲ
		ᆩ		k
		ᆩ	(A	k-
		ᆩᄒ		kh	// 꺾히다

.group		ᆿ	// ㅋ
		ᆿ		k
		ᆿ	(A	kh

.group		ᆮ	// ㄷ
		ᆮ		d- // Actually a soft D.
		ᆮᄂ		nn
		ᆮᄆ		mm
		ᆮᄒ		th
		ᆮ	(L02	dZ;

.group		ᇀ	// ㅌ
		ᇀ		t-
		ᇀᄂ		nn
		ᇀᄆ		mm
		ᇀ	(A	th
		ᇀ	(L02	tSh;

.group		ᆸ	// ㅂ
		ᆸ		p
		ᆸᄒ		ph

.group		ᆹ	// ㅄ
		ᆹ		p
		ᆹ	(A	ps-
		ᆹᄒ		ps-

.group		ᇁ	// ㅍ
		ᇁ		p
		ᇁ	(A	ph

.group		ᆺ	// ㅅ
		ᆺ		t-
		ᆺᄂ		nn
		ᆺᄆ		mm
		ᆺ	(A	s
		ᆺᄒ		s-

.group		ᆻ	// ㅆ
		ᆻ		t-
		ᆻᄂ		nn
		ᆻᄆ		mm
		ᆻ	(A	s-

.group		ᆽ	// ㅈ
		ᆽ		t
		ᆽᄂ		nn
		ᆽᄆ		mm
		ᆽ	(A	tS;

.group		ᆾ	// ㅊ
		ᆾ		t
		ᆾᄂ		nn
		ᆾᄆ		mm
		ᆾ	(A	tSh;

.group		ᆫ	// ㄴ
		ᆫ		n

.group		ᆬ	// ㄵ
		ᆬ		n
		ᆬ	(A	ndZ;

.group		ᆭ	// ㄶ
		ᆭ		n
		ᆭ	(A	n	// no nh

.group		ᆷ	// ㅁ
		ᆷ		m

.group		ᆼ	// ㅇ
		ᆼ		N

.group		ᇂ	// ㅎ
		ᇂ		t-
		ᇂ	(A

.group		ᆯ	// ㄹ
		ᆯ		rr
		ᆯᄅ		l
		ᆯ	(A	*

.group		ᆰ	// ㄺ
		ᆰ		k
		ᆰ	(A	lg

.group		ᆱ	// ㄻ
		ᆱ		m
		ᆱ	(A	lm

.group		ᆲ	// ㄼ
		ᆲ		p
		ᆲ	(A	lb

.group		ᆳ	// ㄽ
		ᆳ		l
		ᆳ	(A	ls

.group		ᆴ	// ㄾ
		ᆴ		l
		ᆴ	(A	lth

.group		ᆵ	// ㄿ
		ᆵ		p
		ᆵ	(A	lph

.group		ᆶ	// ㅀ
		ᆶ		l
		ᆶ	(A	*

.group
       .
       ː
